Louisiana, session 2026, HB631.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 56:3002(B)(9) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §3002. Recreational hunting licenses; fees
8 * * *
9 B. Nonresident licenses:
10 * * *
11 (9) Bear hunting license $100.00
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.